New York, session 2025-2026, A5367.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 3216 of the insurance law is amended by adding a 2 new subsection (n) to read as follows: 3 (n) With respect to high deductible health plans offered in conjunc- 4 tion with a health reimbursement account or a health savings account, if 5 application of any cost sharing requirements would result in health 6 savings account ineligibility under section two hundred twenty-three of 7 the internal revenue code, such cost sharing requirement shall apply for 8 health savings account-qualified high deductible health plans with 9 respect to the deductible of such a plan, only after the enrollee has 10 satisfied the minimum deductible under section two hundred twenty-three 11 of the internal revenue code, except with respect to items or services 12 that are considered preventive care pursuant to subparagraph (C) of 13 paragraph two of subsection c of section two hundred twenty-three of the 14 internal revenue code, in which case the cost-sharing requirements of 15 this section shall apply regardless of whether the minimum deductible 16 required under section two hundred twenty-three of the internal revenue 17 code has been satisfied. 18 § 2. Section 3221 of the insurance law is amended by adding a new 19 subsection (v) to read as follows: 20 (v) With respect to high deductible health plans offered in conjunc- 21 tion with a health reimbursement account or a health savings account, if 22 application of any cost sharing requirements would result in health 23 savings account ineligibility under section two hundred twenty-three of 24 the internal revenue code, such cost sharing requirement shall apply for EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD07833-04-5 A. 5367--A 2 1 health savings account-qualified high deductible health plans with 2 respect to the deductible of such a plan, only after the enrollee has 3 satisfied the minimum deductible under section two hundred twenty-three 4 of the internal revenue code, except with respect to items or services 5 that are considered preventive care pursuant to subparagraph (C) of 6 paragraph two of subsection c of section two hundred twenty-three of the 7 internal revenue code, in which case the cost-sharing requirements of 8 this section shall apply regardless of whether the minimum deductible 9 required under section two hundred twenty-three of the internal revenue 10 code has been satisfied. 11 § 3. Section 4303 of the insurance law is amended by adding a new 12 subsection (ww) to read as follows: 13 (ww) With respect to high deductible health plans offered in conjunc- 14 tion with a health reimbursement account or a health savings account, if 15 application of any cost sharing requirements would result in health 16 savings account ineligibility under section two hundred twenty-three of 17 the internal revenue code, such cost sharing requirement shall apply for 18 health savings account-qualified high deductible health plans with 19 respect to the deductible of such a plan, only after the enrollee has 20 satisfied the minimum deductible under section two hundred twenty-three 21 of the internal revenue code, except with respect to items or services 22 that are considered preventive care pursuant to subparagraph (C) of 23 paragraph two of subsection c of section two hundred twenty-three of the 24 internal revenue code, in which case the cost-sharing requirements of 25 this section shall apply regardless of whether the minimum deductible 26 required under section two hundred twenty-three of the internal revenue 27 code has been satisfied. 28 § 4. This act shall take effect immediately.